Colorado, session 2026A, SB127.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-13.3-503, add
(14.5) as follows:
8-13.3-503. Definitions.
As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:
(14.5) (a) "NEONATAL INTENSIVE CARE UNIT" MEANS AN
INPATIENT FACILITY THAT IS EQUIPPED TO PROVIDE CONTINUOUS,
SPECIALIZED MEDICAL CARE FOR CRITICALLY ILL OR MEDICALLY FRAGILE
INFANTS.
(b) "NEONATAL INTENSIVE CARE UNIT" INCLUDES AN INTENSIVE
CARE UNIT INTO WHICH AN INFANT IS TRANSFERRED DIRECTLY AFTER
BIRTH OR, IF THE TRANSFER IS DUE TO AN ESCALATION OF THE INFANT'S
MEDICAL NEEDS, FROM ANOTHER NEONATAL INTENSIVE CARE UNIT.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-13.3-505, amend
(1) as follows:
8-13.3-505. Duration.
(1) The maximum number of weeks for which a covered
individual may take paid family and medical leave and for which family
and medical leave insurance benefits are payable for any purpose, or
purposes in aggregate, under section 8-13.3-504 (2) in an application year
is twelve weeks; except that benefits are payable up to:
(a) An additional four weeks to a covered individual with a
serious health condition related to pregnancy complications or childbirth
complications; and
-2- SB26-127

(b) For claims arising on or after January 1, 2026, an additional
twelve weeks to a covered individual who has a child receiving inpatient
care in a neonatal intensive care unit for the duration that the child is
receiving care in the neonatal intensive care unit; AND
(c) FOR CLAIMS ARISING ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, AN
ADDITIONAL TWO WEEKS TO A COVERED INDIVIDUAL FOLLOWING THE
DEATH OF A FAMILY MEMBER FOR WHOM THE COVERED INDIVIDUAL USED
PAID FAMILY AND MEDICAL LEAVE TO PROVIDE CARE, PURSUANT TO
SECTION 8-13.3-504 (2), WHICH ADDITIONAL LEAVE MUST BE USED WITHIN
ONE YEAR FOLLOWING THE DEATH OF THE FAMILY MEMBER AND WITHIN
ONE YEAR OF THE END OF THE APPLICATION YEAR.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-3- SB26-127